District of Columbia statutes.
38-281

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Child and Adult Care Food Program” or “CACF Program” means the program authorized by section 17 of the National School Lunch Act, approved October 7, 1975 (89 Stat. 522; 42 U.S.C. § 1766).

(2)

“Child development facility” means a licensed community-based center, home, or other structure, regardless of its name, that provides care, supervision, guidance, and other services for infants, toddlers, and preschoolers on a regular basis. The term “child development facility” does not include a child development center or program that is sponsored or run by a public or private school.

(3)

“Eligible child” means a child who is a District resident who occupies a slot funded in whole or in part by the childcare subsidy program, authorized by § 4-402, subchapter I of Chapter 29 of this title [§ 38-2901 et seq.], or the District of Columbia Public Schools’ Head Start program.

(4)

“Farm-to-preschool programs” means programs at child development facilities that connect early care and education settings to local food producers, as an extension of the farm-to-school model, which connect children to local foods through meals and snacks, taste tests, lessons, farmer visits, cooking, field trips, growing food, and community and parent engagement.

(5)

“Infant” means a child younger than 12 months of age.

(6)

“Locally grown” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 38-821.01(3).

(7)

“OSSE” means the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, established by § 38-2601.

(8)

“Preschool” or “preschooler” means a child older than 24 months of age but younger than compulsory school attendance age, who is not enrolled in a public, charter, or private school.

(9)

“Sustainable agriculture” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 38-821.01(9).

(10)

“Toddler” means a child between 12 months of age and 24 months of age.

(11)

“Unprocessed” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 38-821.01(10).

(12)

“WIC” means the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, as provided in section 17 of the Child Nutrition Act of 1966, approved September 26, 1972 (86 Stat. 729; 42 U.S.C. § 1786).

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4072, 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) addition of this chapter, see §§ 4072-4075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this chapter, see §§ 4072-4075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this chapter, see §§ 4072-4075 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 4077, an applicability clause, see § 7016(f)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).